test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-eetam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ētam: # Noun 156 'eng /est heide/fin' - full paradigm
     ētam+N+Sg+Nom: ētam
     ētam+N+Sg+Gen: ētam
     ētam+N+Sg+Par: ētamt
     ētam+N+Sg+Dat: ētamõn
     ētam+N+Sg+Ins: ētamõks
     ētam+N+Sg+Ill: ētamõ
     ētam+N+Sg+Ela: ētamõst
     ētam+N+Pl+Nom: eitmõd
     ētam+N+Pl+Gen: eitmõd
     ētam+N+Pl+Par: eitmidi
     ētam+N+Pl+Dat: eitmõdõn
     ētam+N+Pl+Ins: eitmõdõks
     ētam+N+Pl+Ill: eitmiž
     ētam+N+Pl+Ela: eitmist
